Hawaii statutes.
§386-95 Reports of injuries, other reports,
penalty. Every employer shall keep a record of all injuries, fatal or
otherwise, received by the employer's employees in the course of their
employment, when known to the employer or brought to the employer's attention.

Within seven working days after the employer
has knowledge of such injury causing absence from work for one day or more or
requiring medical treatment beyond ordinary first aid, the employer shall make
a report thereon to the director. The report shall set forth the name,
address, and nature of the employer's business and the name, age, sex, wages,
and occupation of the injured employee and shall state the date and hour of the
accident, if the injury is produced thereby, the nature and cause of the
injury, and such other information as the director may require.

By January 31 of each year, the employer shall
file with the director a report with respect to each injury on which the
employer is continuing to pay compensation, showing all amounts paid by the
employer on account of the injury.

The reports required by this section shall be
made on forms to be obtained from the director pursuant to section 386-71 and
deposit of reports in the United States mail or by electronic means as approved
by the director, addressed to the director, within the time specified shall be
deemed compliance with the requirements of this section.

When an injury results in immediate death, the
employer shall within forty-eight hours notify personally or by telephone a representative
of the department in the county where the injury occurred.

Within thirty days after final payment of
compensation for an injury, the employer shall file a final report with the
director showing the total payments made, the date of termination of temporary
total disability, and such other information as the director may require.

Any employer who wilfully refuses or neglects
to file any of the reports or give any notice required by this section shall be
fined by the director not more than $5,000.

Copies of all reports, other than those of
fatal injuries, filed with the director as required by this section shall be
sent to the injured employee by the employer. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; am L
1965, c 59, §1; Supp, §97‑110; am L 1966, c 7, §2; HRS §386‑95; am
L 1973, c 10, §1; am L 1982, c 51, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 37, §3; am L
1993, c 254, §1; am L 2002, c 221, §1; am L 2016, c 187, §2]

Case Notes

Failure of employer to file form reporting employee's injury
does not toll statute of limitations. 68 H. 111, 706 P.2d 13 (1985).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next